Vermont, session 2025-2026, S129.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 8 V.S.A. § 2577 is amended to read:
§ 2577. VIRTUAL-CURRENCY KIOSK OPERATORS
(a) Daily transaction limit.
(1) A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall not accept or dispense more
than $1,000.00 $2,000.00 of cash in a day in connection with virtual-currency
transactions with a single new customer in this State via one or more money
transmission kiosks. As used in this section, a “new customer” means an
individual who has not completed more than two virtual-currency transactions
with a virtual-currency kiosk operator or who has completed a second virtual-
currency transaction with a virtual-currency kiosk operator but that transaction
was completed not more than 72 hours ago.
VT LEG #381384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.129
2025 Page 2 of 10
(2) A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall not accept or dispense more
than $5,000.00 of cash in a day in connection with virtual-currency
transactions with a single existing customer in this State via one or more
money transmission kiosks. As used in this section, an “existing customer”
means an individual who has completed at least two virtual-currency
transactions with a virtual-currency kiosk operator and the second virtual-
currency transaction occurred more than 72 hours ago.
(b) Fee cap. The aggregate fees and charges, directly or indirectly, charged
to a customer related to a single transaction or series of related transactions
involving virtual currency effected through a money transmission kiosk in this
State, including any difference between the price charged to a customer to buy,
sell, exchange, swap, or convert virtual currency and the prevailing market
value of such virtual currency at the time of such transaction, shall not exceed
the greater of the following:
(1) $5.00; or
(2) three percent 15 percent of the U.S. dollar equivalent of virtual
currency involved in the transaction or transactions.
(c) Single transaction. The purchase, sale, exchange, swap, or conversion
of virtual currency, or the subsequent transfer of virtual currency, in a series of
transactions shall be deemed to be a single transaction for purposes of
subsection (b) of this section.
VT LEG #381384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.129
2025 Page 3 of 10
(d) Licensing requirement. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall comply
with the licensing requirements of this subchapter to the extent that the virtual-
currency kiosk operator engages in virtual-currency business activity.
(e) Operator accountability. If a virtual-currency kiosk operator allows or
facilitates another person to engage in virtual-currency business activity via a
money transmission kiosk in this State that is owned, operated, or managed by
the virtual-currency kiosk operator, the virtual-currency kiosk operator shall do
all of the following:
(1) ensure that the person engaging in virtual-currency business activity
is licensed under subchapter 2 of this chapter to engage in virtual-currency
business activity and complies with all other applicable provisions of this
chapter;
(2) ensure that any charges collected from a customer via the money
transmission kiosk comply with the limits provided by subsection (b) of this
section; and
(3) comply with all other applicable provisions of this chapter.
(f) Moratorium. To protect the public safety and welfare and safeguard the
rights of consumers, virtual-currency kiosks shall not be permitted to operate
in Vermont prior to July 1, 2025. This moratorium shall not apply to a virtual-
currency kiosk that was operational in Vermont on or before June 30, 2024
Disclosure of material risks. As part of establishing a relationship with a
VT LEG #381384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.129
2025 Page 4 of 10
customer, and prior to entering into an initial transaction for, on behalf of, or
with such customer, each virtual-currency kiosk operator shall disclose in
clear, conspicuous, and legible writing in the English language, whether in
accessible terms of service or elsewhere, all material risks associated with its
products, services, and activities and virtual currency generally, including
disclosures substantially similar to the following:
(1) virtual currency is not legal tender, is not backed by the government,
and accounts and value balances are not subject to Federal Deposit Insurance
Corporation or Securities Investor Protection Corporation protections;
(2) legislative and regulatory changes or actions at the State, federal, or
international level may adversely affect the use, transfer, exchange, and value
of virtual currency;
(3) transactions in virtual currency may be irreversible and, accordingly,
losses due to fraudulent or accidental transactions may not be recoverable;
(4) some virtual currency transactions shall be deemed to be made when
recorded on a public ledger, which is not necessarily the date or time that the
customer initiates the transaction;
(5) the value of virtual currency may be derived from the continued
willingness of market participants to exchange fiat currency for virtual
currency, which may result in the potential for permanent and total loss of
VT LEG #381384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.129
2025 Page 5 of 10
value of a particular virtual currency should the market for that virtual
currency disappear;
(6) there is no assurance that a person who accepts a virtual currency as
payment today will continue to do so in the future;
(7) the volatility and unpredictability of the price of virtual currency
relative to fiat currency may result in significant loss over a short period of
time;
(8) the nature of virtual currency may lead to an increased risk of fraud
or cyber attack;
(9) the nature of virtual currency means that any technological
difficulties experienced by the virtual-currency kiosk operator may prevent the
access or use of a customer’s virtual currency; and
(10) any bond or trust account maintained by the virtual-currency kiosk
operator for the benefit of its customers may not be sufficient to cover all
losses incurred by customers.
(g) Report. On or before January 15, 2025, the Commissioner of Financial
Regulation shall report to the House Committee on Commerce and Economic
Development and the Senate Committee on Finance on whether the
requirements of this section coupled with relevant federal requirements are
sufficient to protect customers in Vermont from fraudulent activity. If deemed
necessary and appropriate by the Commissioner, the Commissioner may make
VT LEG #381384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.129
2025 Page 6 of 10
recommendations for additional statutory or regulatory safeguards. In
addition, the Commissioner shall make recommendations for enhanced
oversight and monitoring of virtual-currency kiosks for the purpose of
minimizing their use for illicit activities as described in the U.S. Government
Accountability Office report on virtual currencies, GAO-22-105462, dated
December 2021. Disclosure upon opening account. When opening an account
for a new customer, and prior to entering into an initial transaction for, on
behalf of, or with such customer, each virtual-currency kiosk operator shall
disclose in clear, conspicuous, and legible writing in the English language,
whether in accessible terms of service or elsewhere, all relevant terms and
conditions associated with its products, services, and activities and virtual
currency generally, including disclosures substantially similar to the
following”
(1) the customer’s liability for unauthorized virtual currency
transactions;
(2) under what circumstances the virtual-currency kiosk operator will,
absent a court or government order, disclose information concerning the
customer’s account to third parties;
(3) the customer’s right to receive periodic account statements and
valuations from the virtual-currency kiosk operator;
VT LEG #381384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.129
2025 Page 7 of 10
(4) the customer’s right to receive a receipt, trade ticket, or other
evidence of a transaction;
(5) the customer’s right to prior notice of a change in the virtual-
currency kiosk operator’s rules or policies; and
(6) such other disclosures as are customarily given in connection with
the opening of customer accounts.
(h). Disclosure prior to transaction. Prior to entering into a virtual-currency
transaction with a customer, each virtual-currency kiosk operator shall ensure a
warning is disclosed to a customer substantially similar to the following:
Customer Notice. Please Read Carefully.
Did you receive a phone call from your bank, software provider, the police,
or were you directed to make a payment for social security, utility bill,
investment, warrants, or bail money at this kiosk? STOP
Is anyone on the phone pressuring you to make a payment of any kinds?
STOP
I understand that the purchase and sale of cryptocurrency is a final,
irreversible, and nonrefundable transaction.
I confirm I am sending funds to a wallet I own or directly have control over.
I confirm that I am using funds gained from my own initiative to make my
transaction.
VT LEG #381384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.129
2025 Page 8 of 10
(i) Blockchain analytics. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall use
blockchain analytics software to assist in the prevention of sending purchased
virtual currency from a virtual-currency kiosk operator to a digital wallet
known to be affiliated with fraudulent activity at the time of a transaction. The
Commissioner may request evidence from any virtual-currency kiosk operator
of current use of blockchain analytics.
(j) Customer service. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall provide live
customer service at a minimum on Monday through Friday between the hours
for 8:00 a.m. and 10:00 p.m. CST. The customer service toll free number shall
be displayed on the virtual-currency kiosk or the virtual-currency kiosk screen.
(k) Fraud prevention. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall take
reasonable steps to detect and prevent fraud, including establishing and
maintaining a written anti-fraud policy. The anti-fraud policy shall, at a
minimum, include the following:
(1) the identification and assessment of fraud related risk areas;
(2) procedures and controls to protect against identified risks;
(3) allocation of responsibility for monitoring risks; and
(4) procedures for the periodic evaluation and revision of the anti-fraud
procedures, controls, and monitoring mechanisms.
(l) Due diligence policy. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall maintain,
implement, and enforce a written Enhanced Due Diligence Policy. The Policy
VT LEG #381384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.129
2025 Page 9 of 10
shall be reviewed and approved by the virtual-currency kiosk operator’s board
of directors or an equivalent governing body of the virtual-currency kiosk
operator. The Policy shall identify, at a minimum, individuals who are at risk
of fraud based on age or mental capacity.
(m) Compliance policies. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall maintain,
implement, and enforce written compliance policies and procedures. Such
policies and procedures shall be reviewed and approved by the virtual-currency
kiosk operator’s board of directors or an equivalent governing body of the
virtual-currency kiosk operator.
(n) Compliance officer.
(1) A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall designate and employ a
compliance officer who meets the following requirements:
(A) is qualified to coordinate and monitor compliance with this
section and all other applicable federal and State laws and regulations;
(B) is employed full-time by the virtual-currency kiosk operator; and
(C) is not an individual who owns more than 20 percent of the
virtual-currency kiosk operator by whom the individual is employed.
(2) Compliance responsibilities required under federal and State law and
regulation shall be completed by one or more full-time employees of the
virtual-currency kiosk operator.
VT LEG #381384 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.129
2025 Page 10 of 10
(o) Consumer protection officer. A virtual-currency kiosk operator shall
designate and employe a consumer protection officer who meets the following
requirements:
(1) is qualified to coordinate and monitor compliance with this section
and all other applicable federal and State laws and regulations;
(2) is employed full-time by the virtual-currency kiosk operator; and
(3) is not an individual who owns more than 20 percent of the virtual-
currency kiosk operator by whom the individual is employed.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #381384 v.1